Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3856
(UTC 604) Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust; distribution of trust property.

(UTC 604) (a) A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable at the settlor's death within the earlier of:

(1) one year after the settlor's death; or

(2) one hundred twenty days after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust's existence, of the trustee's name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

(b) Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor's death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for doing so unless:

(1) the trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

(2) a potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within sixty days after the contestant sent the notification.

(c) A beneficiary in receipt of property from a trust that is determined to have been invalid is liable to return:

(1) the property and its income since distribution, if the beneficiary has the property; or

(2) the value of the property as of the date of disposition of the property, and its income and gain received by the beneficiary, if the beneficiary has disposed of the property.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 56.